Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Oaths; Bonds

§ 831.
Oaths.

The clerk, selectboard members, constables, listers, and fence viewers of a town shall be sworn before entering upon the duties of their offices. A record thereof shall be made by the town clerk.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 832.
Bonds; requirements.

Before the school directors, constable, road commissioner, collector of taxes, treasurer, assistant treasurer when appointed by the selectboard, clerk, and any other officer or employee of the town who has authority to receive or disburse town funds enter upon the duties of their offices, the selectboard shall require each to give a bond conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties: the school directors, to the town school district; the other named officers, to the town. The treasurer, assistant treasurer when appointed by the selectboard, and collector shall also be required to give a bond to the town school district for like purpose. All such bonds shall be in sufficient sums and with sufficient sureties as prescribed and approved by the selectboard. If the selectboard at any time considers a bond of any such officer or employee to be insufficient, it may require, by written order, the officer or employee to give an additional bond in such sum as it deems necessary. If an officer or employee, so required, neglects for ten days after such request to give such original or additional bond, his or her office shall be vacant. A bond furnished pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be valid if signed by any other officer of the same municipality as surety thereon.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 183

, § 2;

1967, No. 147

, § 36, eff. Oct. 1, 1968;

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

Form of bond.

Fact that instrument written in form of bond but not under seal, executed by one elected constable, did not occasion vacancy in office. Wilson v. Wheeler, 55 Vt. 446, 1882 Vt. LEXIS 66 (1882).

§ 833.
Approval; record; evidence.

On the approval of a bond required by section 832 of this title, the selectboard of a town shall file the same in the office of the town clerk to be recorded by such clerk in a book kept for that purpose.
Copies thereof duly certified by such clerk shall be evidence in court as if the original were produced.

§ 834.
Neglect of clerk or constable; indemnity.

A town shall make good the pecuniary damages which may accrue to a person by the neglect or default of the town clerk or constable of such town, to be recovered in a civil action on this statute.

Parties.

Joint action may be maintained against the officer and the town. Lyman v. Windsor, 24 Vt. 575, 1852 Vt. LEXIS 87 (1852).

§ 835.
Payment of premiums.

Bonds required of officers of a municipality shall be paid for by the municipality requiring the same.